Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.090

Lease of unnecessary lands to nonprofit groups—Funds.

The director of agriculture may, at his or her discretion, for a period of not to exceed ten years, lease state lands which are now or may hereafter be, under his or her direction and control, the retention of which he or her [she] deems unnecessary for present state purposes or needs, to any nonprofit group or organization having educational, agricultural, or youth development purposes. Such leases shall be upon such terms as the director deems beneficial to the state. All rental funds received by the director under the provisions of this section shall be deposited in the fair fund created under RCW 15.76.115.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6002; 1998 c 345 s 1; 1961 c 11 s 15.04.090. Prior: 1953 c 119 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1998 c 345: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1998 c 345 s 14.]

Effective date—Contingent effective date—1998 c 345: "(1) Sections 1 through 9, and *16 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [April 3, 1998].

(2) Sections 10 through 12 of this act take effect July 1, 2001, if the repeal of RCW 67.16.100, 67.16.105, and 67.16.170 under section 9 of this act becomes effective." [ 1998 c 345 s 15.]

*Reviser's note: Section 16 of this act was vetoed by the governor.